Tennessee, session 114, HB2467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-311, is amended by deleting
subdivision (d)(2).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-311, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (e)(1) and (2) and substituting:
(1) If the trial judge finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
has violated the conditions of probation and suspension of sentence for a felony or
misdemeanor offense by engaging in conduct that is a technical violation, then the trial
judge may temporarily revoke the probation and suspension of sentence by an order
duly entered upon the minutes of the court, and:
(A) Impose a term of incarceration not to exceed:
(i) Ninety (90) days for a first revocation;
(ii) One hundred eighty (180) days for a second revocation; or
(iii) The remainder of the sentence for a third or subsequent
revocation; or
(B) Resentence the defendant for the remainder of the unexpired term to
a sentence of probation that includes the condition of participating in a
community-based alternative to incarceration as provided in § 40-35-104(c)(9);
provided, that the violation of probation and suspension is a technical violation
and does not involve the commission of a new offense.
HB2467
010490
- 1 -

(2) If the trial judge revokes a defendant's probation and suspension of sentence
after finding, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant has committed a
new felony, new Class A misdemeanor, zero tolerance violation as defined by the
department of correction community supervision sanction matrix, violation of a
specialized condition of probation imposed by the court, absconding, or contacting the
defendant's victim in violation of a condition of probation, then the trial judge may revoke
the probation and suspension of sentence by an order duly entered upon the minutes of
the court, and cause the defendant to commence the execution of the judgment as
originally entered, which may be reduced by an amount of time not to exceed the
amount of time the defendant has successfully served on probation and suspension of
sentence prior to the violation.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-311(g), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(g) As used in this section, "technical violation" means an act that violates the
terms or conditions of probation but does not constitute a new felony, new Class A
misdemeanor, zero tolerance violation as defined by the department of correction
community supervision sanction matrix, violation of a specialized condition of probation
imposed by the court, absconding, or contacting the defendant's victim in violation of a
condition of probation.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010490